src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-fem-null_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # pheen o-stem
    pheen+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: pheen
    pheen+N+Fem+Sg+Obl: phenja
    pheen+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: phenjake
    pheen+N+Fem+Sg+Abl: phenjata
    pheen+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: phenjaha
    pheen+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: phenjako
    pheen+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [phenjakiiro, phenjakiiri, phenjakiire]
    pheen+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: phenja
    pheen+N+Fem+Pl+Obl: phenjen
    pheen+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: phenjenge
    pheen+N+Fem+Pl+Abl: phenjenna
    pheen+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: phenjensa
    pheen+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: phenjengo
    pheen+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [phenjengiiro, phenjengiiri, phenjengiire]
